Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB220.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 189A.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person shall not operate or be in physical control of a motor vehicle anywhere in
this state:
(a) Having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more as measured by a
scientifically reliable test or tests of a sample of the person's breath or blood
taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical control of a
motor vehicle;
(b) While under the influence of alcohol;
(c) While under the influence of any other substance or combination of
substances which impairs one's driving ability;
(d) While the presence of a controlled substance listed in subsection (12) of this
section is detected in the blood, as measured by a scientifically reliable test, or
tests, taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical control
of a motor vehicle;
(e) While under the combined influence of alcohol and any other substance which
impairs one's driving ability; or
(f) Having an alcohol concentration of 0.02 or more as measured by a
scientifically reliable test or tests of a sample of the person's breath or blood
taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical control of a
motor vehicle, if the person is under the age of twenty-one (21).
(2) With the exception of the results of the tests administered pursuant to KRS
189A.103(7):
(a) If the sample of the person's blood or breath that is used to determine the
alcohol concentration thereof was obtained more than two (2) hours after
cessation of operation or physical control of a motor vehicle, the results of the
Page 1 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
test or tests shall be inadmissible as evidence in a prosecution under
subsection (1)(a) or (f) of this section. The results of the test or tests, however,
may be admissible in a prosecution under subsection (1)(b) or (e) of this
section; or
(b) If the sample of the person's blood that is used to determine the presence of a
controlled substance was obtained more than two (2) hours after cessation of
operation or physical control of a motor vehicle, the results of the test or tests
shall be inadmissible as evidence in a prosecution under subsection (1)(d) of
this section. The results of the test or tests, however, may be admissible in a
prosecution under subsection (1)(c) or (e) of this section.
(3) In any prosecution for a violation of subsection (1)(b) or (e) of this section in which
the defendant is charged with having operated or been in physical control of a
motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, the alcohol concentration in the
defendant's blood as determined at the time of making analysis of his or her blood
or breath shall give rise to the following presumptions:
(a) If there was an alcohol concentration of less than 0.04[ based upon the
definition of alcohol concentration in KRS 189A.005], it shall be presumed
that the defendant was not under the influence of alcohol; and
(b) If there was an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or greater but less than 0.08[
based upon the definition of alcohol concentration in KRS 189A.005], that
fact shall not constitute a presumption that the defendant either was or was not
under the influence of alcohol, but that fact may be considered, together with
other competent evidence, in determining the guilt or innocence of the
defendant.
The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed as limiting the introduction
of any other competent evidence bearing upon the questions of whether the
defendant was under the influence of alcohol or other substances, in any
Page 2 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
prosecution for a violation of subsection (1)(b) or (e) of this section.
(4) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the fact that any person
charged with violation of subsection (1) of this section is legally entitled to
use any substance, including alcohol, shall not constitute a defense against
any charge of violation of subsection (1) of this section.
(b) A laboratory test or tests for a controlled substance shall be inadmissible as
evidence in a prosecution under subsection (1)(d) of this section upon a
finding by the court that the defendant consumed the substance under a valid
prescription from a practitioner, as defined in KRS 218A.010, acting in the
course of his or her professional practice. However, a laboratory test for a
controlled substance may be admissible as evidence in a prosecution under
subsection (1)(c) or (e) of this section.
(5) Any person who violates the provisions of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of
subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) For the first offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than two
hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or be
imprisoned in the county jail for not less than forty-eight (48) hours nor more
than thirty (30) days, or both. Following sentencing, the defendant may apply
to the judge for permission to enter a community labor program for not less
than forty-eight (48) hours nor more than thirty (30) days in lieu of fine or
imprisonment, or both. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in
subsection (11) of this section are present while the person was operating or in
physical control of a motor vehicle, the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment shall be four (4) days, which term shall not be suspended,
probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of early
release;
(b) For the second offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than
Page 3 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
three hundred fifty dollars ($350) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500)
and shall be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than seven (7) days nor
more than six (6) months and, in addition to fine and imprisonment, may be
sentenced to community labor for not less than ten (10) days nor more than
six (6) months. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in subsection
(11) of this section are present, the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment shall be fourteen (14) days, which term shall not be suspended,
probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of early
release;
(c) [For a third offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than five
hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall
be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than thirty (30) days nor more
than twelve (12) months and may, in addition to fine and imprisonment, be
sentenced to community labor for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than
twelve (12) months. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in
subsection (11) of this section are present, the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment shall be sixty (60) days, which term shall not be suspended,
probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of early
release;
(d) ]For a third[fourth] or subsequent offense within a ten (10) year period, be
guilty of a Class D felony. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in
subsection (11) of this section are present, the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment shall be two hundred forty (240) days, which term shall not be
suspended, probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of
release; and
(d)[(e)] For purposes of this subsection, prior offenses shall include all
convictions in this state, and any other state or jurisdiction, for operating or
Page 4 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
being in control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or
other substances that impair one's driving ability, or any combination of
alcohol and such substances, or while having an unlawful alcohol
concentration, or driving while intoxicated, but shall not include convictions
for violating subsection (1)(f) of this section. A court shall receive as proof of
a prior conviction a copy of that conviction, certified by the court ordering the
conviction.
(6) (a) Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (1)(f) of this section
shall:
1. For the first offense, be fined no less than two hundred dollars
($200)[one hundred dollars ($100)] and no more than five hundred
dollars ($500), or sentenced to twenty (20) hours of community service
in lieu of a fine;[.]
2. For the second offense, be fined no less than three hundred fifty
dollars ($350) and no more than five hundred dollars ($500) and shall
be sentenced to twenty (20) hours of community service; and
3. For the third or subsequent offense, be fined no less than five hundred
dollars ($500) and no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and
shall be sentenced to forty (40) hours of community service.
(b) A person subject to the penalties of this subsection shall not be subject to the
penalties established in subsection (5) of this section or any other penalty
established pursuant to KRS Chapter 189A, except those established in KRS
189A.040(1) and [KRS ]189A.070.
(7) If the person is under the age of twenty-one (21) and there was an alcohol
concentration of 0.08 or greater[ based on the definition of alcohol concentration in
KRS 189A.005], the person shall be subject to the penalties established pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section.
Page 5 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
(8) (a) For a second or third offense under subsection (5) of this section within a ten
(10) year period, the minimum sentence of imprisonment or community labor
shall not be suspended, probated, or subject to conditional discharge or other
form of early release.
(b) For a third[fourth] or subsequent offense under subsection (5) of this section,
the minimum term of imprisonment shall be one hundred twenty (120) days,
and this term shall not be suspended, probated, or subject to conditional
discharge or other form of early release.
(c) For a second or subsequent offense under subsection (5) of this section, at
least forty-eight (48) hours of the mandatory sentence shall be served
consecutively.
(9) When sentencing persons under subsection (5)(a) of this section, at least one (1) of
the penalties shall be assessed and that penalty shall not be suspended, probated, or
subject to conditional discharge or other form of early release.
(10) In determining the ten (10) year period under this section, the period shall be
measured from the dates on which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of
conviction were entered.
(11) For purposes of this section, aggravating circumstances are any one (1) or more of
the following:
(a) Operating a motor vehicle in excess of thirty (30) miles per hour above the
speed limit;
(b) Operating a motor vehicle in the wrong direction on a limited access highway;
(c) Operating a motor vehicle that causes an accident resulting in death or serious
physical injury as defined in KRS 500.080;
(d) Operating a motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration in the operator's
blood or breath is 0.15 or more as measured by a test or tests of a sample of
the operator's blood or breath taken within two (2) hours of cessation of
Page 6 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
operation of the motor vehicle;
(e) Refusing to submit to any test or tests of one's blood, breath, or urine
requested by an officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person was
operating or in physical control of a motor vehicle in violation of subsection
(1) of this section, except it shall not be considered an aggravating
circumstance for a first offense under subsection (5)(a) of this section; and
(f) Operating a motor vehicle that is transporting a passenger under the age of
twelve (12) years old.
(12) The substances applicable to a prosecution under subsection (1)(d) of this section
are:
(a) Any Schedule I controlled substance except marijuana;
(b) Alprazolam;
(c) Amphetamine;
(d) Buprenorphine;
(e) Butalbital;
(f) Carisoprodol;
(g) Cocaine;
(h) Diazepam;
(i) Hydrocodone;
(j) Meprobamate;
(k) Methadone;
(l) Methamphetamine;
(m) Oxycodone;
(n) Promethazine;
(o) Propoxyphene; and
(p) Zolpidem.
Section 2. KRS 189A.070 is amended to read as follows:
Page 7 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
(1) (a) 1. Unless the person is under eighteen (18) years of age, in addition to the
penalties specified in KRS 189A.010, the Transportation Cabinet shall
suspend a person's license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle
upon conviction of KRS 189A.010(1).
2. Upon conviction of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e), the
Transportation Cabinet shall suspend a person's license to operate a
motor vehicle or motorcycle as follows:
a. For the first offense within a ten (10) year period:
i. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 and who meets the ninety (90) consecutive
day requirement within the first four (4) months of the
issuance of the ignition interlock license, four (4) months;
ii. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 but does not meet the ninety (90)
consecutive day requirement within the first four (4) months
of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, until the
person meets the ninety (90) consecutive day requirement or
six (6) months, whichever is shorter; or
iii. For all others, six (6) months;
b. For the second offense within a ten (10) year period:
i. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 and who meets the one hundred twenty (120)
consecutive day requirement within the first twelve (12)
months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license,
twelve (12) months;
ii. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 but does not meet the one hundred twenty
Page 8 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
(120) consecutive day requirement within the first twelve
(12) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license,
until the person meets the one hundred twenty (120)
consecutive day requirement or eighteen (18) months,
whichever is shorter; or
iii. For all others, eighteen (18) months;
c. For a third offense within a ten (10) year period:
i. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 and who meets the one hundred twenty (120)
consecutive day requirement within the first eighteen (18)
months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license,
eighteen (18) months;
ii. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 but does not meet the one hundred twenty
(120) consecutive day requirement within the first eighteen
(18) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license,
until the person meets the one hundred twenty (120)
consecutive day requirement or thirty-six (36) months,
whichever is shorter; or
iii. For all others, thirty-six (36) months;
d. For a fourth or subsequent offense within a ten (10) year period:
i. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 and who meets the one hundred twenty (120)
consecutive day requirement within the first thirty (30)
months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, thirty
(30) months;
ii. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
Page 9 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
KRS 189A.340 but does not meet the one hundred twenty
(120) consecutive day requirement within the first thirty (30)
months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, until
the person meets the one hundred twenty (120) consecutive
day requirement or sixty (60) months, whichever is shorter;
or
iii. For all others, sixty (60) months;
e. If the conviction records transmitted to the Transportation Cabinet
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section show that a person was
convicted of a:
i. First offense of KRS 189A.010, the person's license shall be
suspended as provided in subdivision a. of this subparagraph;
ii. Second offense of KRS 189A.010, the person's license shall
be suspended as provided in subdivision b. of this
subparagraph;
iii. Third offense of KRS 189A.010, the person's license shall be
suspended as provided in subdivision c. of this subparagraph;
and
iv. Fourth or subsequent offense of KRS 189A.010, the person's
license shall be suspended as provided in subdivision d. of
this subparagraph; and
f. The license suspension shall be deemed effective on the date of
entry of the court's order or judgement for a conviction of KRS
189A.010.
3. Upon conviction of KRS 189A.010(1)(f), the Transportation Cabinet
shall suspend a person's license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle
as follows:
Page 10 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
a. For the first offense:
i. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 and who meets the ninety (90) consecutive
day requirement within the first four (4) months of the
issuance of the ignition interlock license, four (4) months;
ii.[b.] For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 but does not meet the ninety (90)
consecutive day requirement within the first four (4) months
of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, until the
person meets the ninety (90) consecutive day requirement or
six (6) months, whichever is shorter; or
iii.[c.] For all others, six (6) months;
b. For the second offense:
i. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license
under Section 6 of this Act and who meets the one hundred
twenty (120) consecutive day requirement within the first
twelve (12) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock
license, twelve (12) months;
ii. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license
under Section 6 of this Act but does not meet the one
hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement within
the first twelve (12) months of the issuance of the ignition
interlock license, until the person meets the one hundred
twenty (120) consecutive day requirement or eighteen (18)
months, whichever is shorter; or
iii. For all others, eighteen (18) months; and
c. For a third or subsequent offense:
Page 11 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
i. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license
under Section 6 of this Act and who meets the one hundred
twenty (120) consecutive day requirement within the first
eighteen (18) months of the issuance of the ignition
interlock license, eighteen (18) months;
ii. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license
under Section 6 of this Act but does not meet the one
hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement within
the first eighteen (18) months of the issuance of the
ignition interlock license, until the person meets the one
hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement or
thirty-six (36) months, whichever is shorter; or
iii. For all others, thirty-six (36) months.
4. For purposes of this paragraph, "ninety (90) consecutive day
requirement" and "one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day
requirement" mean the requirements established in KRS
189A.340(4)(b)2.
(b) For a person under the age of eighteen (18), in addition to the penalties
specified in KRS 189A.010, the Transportation Cabinet shall suspend the
person's license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle upon conviction of
KRS 189A.010(1). The person shall have his or her license suspended until he
or she reaches the age of eighteen (18) or as provided in paragraph (a) of this
subsection, whichever penalty will result in the longer period of suspension.
(2) In addition to the period of license suspension set forth in subsection (1) of this
section, no person shall be eligible for reinstatement of his or her full privilege to
operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle until he or she has completed the alcohol or
substance abuse education or treatment program ordered pursuant to KRS
Page 12 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
189A.040.
(3) Upon conviction of KRS 189A.010(1):
(a) A person shall surrender his or her license to operate a motor vehicle or
motorcycle to the court. Should the person fail to surrender his or her license
to the court, the court shall issue an order directing the sheriff or any other
peace officer to seize the license [forthwith ]and deliver it to the court. The
court shall then forward the license to the Transportation Cabinet. This
paragraph shall not apply to a person who has previously surrendered his or
her license pursuant to KRS 189A.200; and
(b) The court shall immediately transmit the conviction records and other
appropriate information to the Transportation Cabinet. A court shall not waive
or stay this procedure.
(4) In determining the ten (10) year period under this section, the period shall be
measured from the dates on which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of
conviction were entered.
Section 3. KRS 189A.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other penalty prescribed by KRS 189A.010(5)(a) or (6), the court
shall sentence the person to attend an alcohol or substance abuse education or
treatment program subject to the following terms and conditions for a first offender
or a person convicted under KRS 189A.010(1)(f):
(a) The treatment or education shall be for a period of ninety (90) days and the
program shall provide an assessment of the defendant's alcohol or other
substance abuse problems, which shall be performed at the start of the
program;
(b) Each defendant shall pay the cost of the education or treatment program up to
his or her ability to pay but no more than the actual cost of the treatment;
(c) Upon written report to the court by the administrator of the program that the
Page 13 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
defendant has completed the program recommended by the administrator
based upon the assessment of the defendant, the defendant shall be released
prior to the expiration of the ninety (90) day period; and
(d) Failure to complete the education or treatment program or to pay the amount
specified by the court for education or treatment shall constitute contempt,
and the court shall, in addition to any other remedy for contempt, reinstitute
all penalties which were previously imposed but suspended or delayed
pending completion of the education or treatment program.
(2) In addition to any other penalty prescribed by KRS 189A.010(5)(b), the court shall
sentence the person to an alcohol or substance abuse treatment program subject to
the following terms and conditions for a second offender:
(a) The sentence shall be for a period of one (1) year and the program shall
provide an assessment of the defendant's alcohol or other substance abuse
problems, which shall be performed at the start of the program;
(b) Each defendant shall pay the cost of the treatment program up to his or her
ability to pay but no more than the actual cost of the treatment;
(c) Upon written report to the court by the administrator of the program that the
defendant has completed the program recommended by the administrator
based upon the assessment of the defendant, the defendant may be released
prior to the expiration of the one (1) year period; and
(d) Failure to complete the treatment program or to pay the amount specified by
the court for treatment shall constitute contempt of court and the court shall,
in addition to any other remedy for contempt, reinstitute all penalties which
were previously imposed but suspended or delayed pending the completion of
the treatment program.
(3) In addition to any other penalty prescribed by KRS 189A.010(5)(c)[ or (d)], the
court shall sentence the person to an alcohol or substance abuse treatment program
Page 14 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
subject to the following terms and conditions for a third or subsequent offender:
(a) The sentence shall be for a period of one (1) year and the program shall
provide an assessment of the defendant's alcohol or other substance abuse
problems, which shall be performed at the start of the program. The program
may be an inpatient or residential-type program;
(b) Each defendant shall pay the cost of the treatment program up to his or her
ability to pay but no more than the actual cost of the program;
(c) A defendant, upon written recommendation to the court by the administrator
of the program, may be released from the inpatient or residential program
prior to the expiration of one (1) year but shall be retained in the program on
an outpatient basis for the remainder of the year period; and
(d) Failure to complete the treatment program or to pay the amount specified by
the court for treatment shall constitute contempt of court, and the court shall,
in addition to any other remedy for contempt, reinstitute all penalties which
were previously imposed but suspended or delayed pending completion of the
treatment program.
(4) Costs of treatment or education programs which are paid from the service fee
established by KRS 189A.050, or from state or federal funds, or any combination
thereof, shall be deducted from the amount which the defendant must pay.
(5) For defendants who are Medicaid-eligible, alcohol or substance abuse treatment
under this section shall be authorized by the Department for Medicaid Services and
its contractors as Medicaid-eligible services and shall be subject to the same
medical necessity criteria and reimbursement methodology as for all other covered
behavioral health services.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "treatment" means service in an alcohol or
substance abuse education or treatment program or facility licensed, regulated, and
monitored by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services for services as required
Page 15 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
under this section.
(7) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall promulgate administrative
regulations for the licensure of education and treatment facilities and programs for
offenders receiving education or treatment under this section. The criteria
developed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall include:
(a) Manner of assessment;
(b) Appropriate education and treatment plans; and
(c) Referrals to other treatment providers.
(8) The participating facilities and programs shall be required to abide by these
standards and shall report completion to the Transportation Cabinet. Upon request,
the facility or program shall report to the courts regarding the progress of offenders
being treated pursuant to this section.
(9) Administrative decisions regarding the licensure of education and treatment
facilities and programs may be appealed, and upon appeal an administrative hearing
shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
Section 4. KRS 189A.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The court shall at the arraignment or as soon as such relevant information becomes
available suspend the motor vehicle operator's license and motorcycle operator's
license and driving privileges of any person charged with a violation of KRS
189A.010(1) who:
(a) Has refused to take an alcohol concentration or substance test as reflected on
the uniform citation form;
(b) Has been convicted of one (1) or more prior offenses as described in KRS
189A.010(5)(d)[(e)] or has had his or her operator's license suspended on one
(1) or more occasions for refusing to take an alcohol concentration or
substance test, in the ten (10) year period immediately preceding his or her
arrest; or
Page 16 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
(c) Was involved in an accident that resulted in death or serious physical injury as
defined in KRS 500.080 to a person other than the defendant.
(2) Persons whose licenses have been suspended pursuant to this section may file a
motion for judicial review of the suspension, and the court shall conduct the review
in accordance with this chapter within thirty (30) days after the filing of the motion.
The court shall, at the time of the suspension, advise the defendant of his or her
rights to the review.
(3) When the court orders the suspension of a license pursuant to:
(a) Subsection (1)(a) of this section, the court may, in addition to any other
conditions the court may order, require that the person apply to the
Transportation Cabinet for issuance of an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 for the period of the suspension;
(b) Subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section, the court shall, in addition to any other
conditions the court may order, require that the person apply to the
Transportation Cabinet for issuance of an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 for the period of suspension; and
(c) Subsection (1) of this section and the person is required to apply for an
ignition interlock license pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection,
the person shall present the completed ignition interlock license application to
the court.
(4) When the court orders the suspension of a license pursuant to this section, the
defendant shall immediately surrender his or her license to operate a motor vehicle
or motorcycle to the court. Should the defendant fail to surrender his or her license
to the court, the court shall issue an order directing the sheriff or any other peace
officer to seize the license forthwith and deliver it to the court. If the license is
currently under suspension, the provisions of this subsection shall not apply.
(5) The Circuit Court Clerk shall forthwith transmit to the Transportation Cabinet:
Page 17 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
(a) Any license surrendered pursuant to this section; and
(b) If the court ordered a person to apply for an ignition interlock device under
subsection (3) of this section, notification of the order.
(6) Licenses suspended under this section shall remain suspended until:
(a) The person is acquitted;
(b) All pending or current charges relating to a violation of KRS 189A.010
have been dismissed; or
(c) The person is convicted and the Transportation Cabinet has suspended
his or her license pursuant to KRS 189A.070;
but in no event for a period longer than the license suspension period
applicable to the person under KRS 189A.070 or 189A.107.
(7) Any person whose operator's license has been suspended pursuant to this section
shall be given credit for all pretrial suspension time against the period of suspension
imposed under KRS 189A.070.
Section 5. KRS 189A.240 is amended to read as follows:
In any judicial review of a pretrial suspension imposed under KRS 189A.200(1)(b), if the
court determines by a preponderance of the evidence that:
(1) The person was charged and arrested by a peace officer with a violation of KRS
189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e);
(2) The peace officer had reasonable grounds to believe that the person was operating a
motor vehicle in violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e);
(3) There is probable cause to believe that the person committed the violation of KRS
189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) as charged; and
(4) The person has been convicted of one (1) or more prior offenses as described in
KRS 189A.010(5)(d)[(e)] or has had his or her motor vehicle operator's license
suspended on one (1) or more occasions for refusing to take an alcohol
concentration or substance test, in the ten (10) year period immediately preceding
Page 18 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
his or her arrest;
then the court shall continue to suspend the person's operator's license or privilege to
operate a motor vehicle, but in no event for a period longer than the license suspension
period applicable to the person under KRS 189A.070 and 189A.107. The provisions of
this section shall not be construed as limiting the person's ability to challenge any prior
convictions or license suspensions or refusals.
Section 6. KRS 189A.340 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) If a person's license is suspended pursuant to this chapter and the initial
suspension was for a violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (e), or (f), the sole
license the person shall be eligible for is an ignition interlock license pursuant
to this section.
(b) If a person's license is suspended pursuant to this chapter and the initial
suspension was for a violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(c) or (d), the person shall
be eligible for an ignition interlock license pursuant to this section and may be
eligible for a hardship license pursuant to KRS 189A.410.
(2) (a) A person may apply for an ignition interlock license anytime, including after
receiving the notices under KRS 189A.105 or after his or her license has been
suspended pursuant to this chapter.
(b) If at the time the person applies for an ignition interlock license, the person's
license has been suspended pursuant to this chapter, the person shall be
authorized to drive to:
1. An ignition interlock device provider to have a functioning ignition
interlock device installed in his or her motor vehicle or motorcycle; and
2. The Transportation Cabinet to obtain an ignition interlock license;
This paragraph shall only apply within fourteen (14) days of the date printed
on the ignition interlock approval letter issued by the Transportation Cabinet
and if the person has the ignition interlock approval letter in the motor vehicle
Page 19 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
or motorcycle.
(3) Before the Transportation Cabinet shall issue an ignition interlock license, the
person shall:
(a) Submit an application for an ignition interlock license;
(b) Provide proof of motor vehicle insurance;
(c) Provide an ignition interlock certificate of installation issued by an ignition
interlock device provider; and
(d) Provide any other information required by administrative regulations
promulgated by the Transportation Cabinet under KRS 189A.350.
(4) An ignition interlock license shall restrict the person to operating only a motor
vehicle or motorcycle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device, unless
the person qualifies for an employer exemption under subsection (6) of this section.
This restriction shall remain in place for:
(a) If a person's license was suspended pretrial pursuant to KRS 189A.200, the
required suspension period under KRS 189A.200(6);
(b) If a person's license was suspended pursuant to KRS 189A.070 or 189A.107:
1. The required suspension period under KRS 189A.070(1); and
2. a. If the maximum suspension period under KRS 189A.070(1)(a) has
not yet been met, until the Transportation Cabinet has received a
declaration from the person's ignition interlock device provider, in
a form provided or approved by the cabinet, certifying that none of
the violations outlined in subdivision b. of this subparagraph has
occurred:
i. For a first offense within a ten (10) year period of KRS
189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) or for the first[any]
offense of KRS 189A.010(1)(f), in the ninety (90)
consecutive days; and
Page 20 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
ii. For all subsequent offenses within a ten (10) year period of
KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) or for all
subsequent offenses of subsection (1)(f) of Section 1 of this
Act, one hundred twenty (120) consecutive days;
prior to the date of releasing the ignition interlock device
restriction.
b. If any of the following occur, it shall be a violation of the ninety
(90) or one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement:
i. Failure to take any random breath alcohol concentration test
unless a review of the digital image confirms that the motor
vehicle or motorcycle was not occupied by a driver at the
time of the missed test;
ii. Failure to pass any random retest with a breath alcohol
concentration of 0.02 or lower unless a subsequent test
performed within ten (10) minutes registers a breath alcohol
concentration lower than 0.02, and the digital image
confirms the same person provided both samples;
iii. Failure of the person, or his or her designee, to appear at the
ignition interlock device provider when required for
maintenance, repair, calibration, monitoring, inspection, or
replacement of the device;
iv. Failure of the person to pay fees established pursuant to
subsection (7) of this section;
v. Tampering with an installed ignition interlock device with
the intent of rendering it defective; or
vi. Altering, concealing, hiding, or attempting to alter, conceal,
or hide, the person's identity from the ignition interlock
Page 21 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
device's camera while providing a breath sample;
(c) If a person's license was suspended pursuant to KRS 189A.090, for the
required suspension period under KRS 189A.090(2); or
(d) If a person's license suspension was extended pursuant to KRS 189A.345, the
required suspension period under KRS 189A.345(1).
(5) (a) The time period a person:
1. Holds a valid ignition interlock license pursuant to this section; or
2. Receives alcohol or substance abuse treatment in an inpatient residential
facility;
shall apply on a day-for-day basis toward satisfying the suspension periods
detailed in subsection (4) of this section.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, the Transportation
Cabinet shall give the person a day-for-day credit for any time period the
person:
1. Held a valid ignition interlock license; or
2. Received alcohol or substance abuse treatment in an inpatient residential
facility.
(c) A person shall not receive day-for-day credit for days the person utilized the
employer exemption in accordance with subsection (6) of this section and
drove an employer's motor vehicle or motorcycle not equipped with a
functioning ignition interlock device.
(6) (a) A person with an ignition interlock license may operate a motor vehicle or
motorcycle not equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device if:
1. The person is required to operate an employer's motor vehicle or
motorcycle in the course and scope of employment; and
2. The business entity that owns the motor vehicle or motorcycle is not
owned or controlled by the person.
Page 22 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
(b) To qualify for the employer exemption, the person shall provide the
Transportation Cabinet with a sworn statement from his or her employer
stating that the person and business entity meet the requirements of paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(7) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, an ignition interlock
device provider may charge the following fees:
1. An installation fee for an alternative fuel vehicle or a vehicle with a
push button starter not to exceed one hundred thirty dollars ($130), an
installation fee for all other vehicles not to exceed one hundred dollars
($100);
2. A monthly fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100);
3. A removal fee not to exceed thirty dollars ($30);
4. A reset fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50); or
5. A missed appointment fee not to exceed thirty-five dollars ($35).
(b) A person who is issued an ignition interlock license shall pay fees as
established in his or her lease agreement with the ignition interlock device
provider for any ignition interlock device installed in his or her motor vehicle
or motorcycle. However, the fees shall never be more than allowed under
paragraph (a) of this subsection and are subject to paragraph (c) of this
subsection.
(c) Any person who has an income:
1. At or below two hundred percent (200%) but above one hundred fifty
percent (150%) of the federal poverty guidelines, shall pay only
seventy-five percent (75%) of fees established pursuant to paragraph (a)
of this subsection;
2. At or below one hundred fifty percent (150%) but above one hundred
percent (100%) of the federal poverty guidelines, shall pay only fifty
Page 23 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 220/GA
percent (50%) of fees established pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection; or
3. At or below one hundred percent (100%) of the federal poverty
guidelines, shall pay only twenty-five percent (25%) of fees established
pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection;
As used in this paragraph, "federal poverty guidelines" has the same meaning
as in KRS 205.5621. The Transportation Cabinet shall determine the person's
income and where that income places the person on the federal poverty
guidelines.
(d) Neither the Commonwealth, the Transportation Cabinet, nor any unit of state
or local government shall be responsible for payment of any costs associated
with an ignition interlock device.
(8) For a person issued an ignition interlock license under this section who is residing
outside of Kentucky, the Transportation Cabinet may accept an ignition interlock
certificate of installation from an ignition interlock device provider authorized to do
business in the state where the person resides if the ignition interlock device meets
the requirements of that state.
Section 7. KRS 281A.2102 is amended to read as follows:
In addition to the penalties established by this chapter for driving a commercial motor
vehicle under the influence of alcohol:
(1) Any person convicted of driving a commercial motor vehicle while the alcohol
concentration of the person's blood or breath is four hundredths (0.04) to eight
hundredths (0.08) shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) and not more
than fifty dollars ($50).
(2) Any person convicted of driving a commercial motor vehicle while the alcohol
concentration of the person's blood or breath is greater than eight hundredths (0.08)
shall be fined under the provisions of KRS 189A.010(5)(a) to (c)[(d)].
Page 24 of 24
HB022010.100 - 833 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:59 PM GA